Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 37.20, is amended to read: 37.20 SPECIAL PEACE OFFICERS. The secretary or the president of the society may appoint, in a writing signed by either of them, as many peace officers, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, deleted text begin clausedeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end (c), as are necessary, both during the annual fair and throughout the year for the regulation of the Minnesota State Fairgrounds. These peace officers, before entering upon their duties, shall take and subscribe the usual oath of office, endorsed upon their appointment. They have upon the fairgrounds all the power and authority of peace officers and may, within these limits, without warrant, arrest any person found violating state law or any rule, bylaw, or ordinance of the society. They may summarily remove the persons and property of the offenders from the grounds, and take them before any court of competent jurisdiction to be dealt with according to law. Each peace officer shall wear an appropriate badge of office while acting as a peace officer. The society may also contract with the state, any county, or any municipality for police service and protection on the fairgrounds.new text begin When major events are held on the fairgrounds that are estimated to draw at least 2,500 attendees, the society must provide police service and protection on the fairgrounds and within half a mile of the fairgrounds.new text end